Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1418.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5103(c)(4) and (e)(3), (4), (5), (6) and (7) of Title 30 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 5103. Boating education.* * *(c) Exemptions.--The following persons are exempt from the requirements of this section:* * *(4) A person who operates a motorboat powered by [an electric motor or by an internal combustion] a motor of 25 horsepower or less that is not a personal watercraft.* * *(e) Commission duties.--The commission shall:123456789101112131415161718 * * *(3) Coordinate a Statewide program of boating safety instruction and certification [at such times and locations to make courses convenient for residents of various counties and to maximize attendance].(4) Issue a certificate of boating safety education to a person who pays the fee under section 5104 (relating to fees) and:(i) passes a commission-approved course in boating safety education; [and] or(ii) [pays the fee set forth in section 5104 (relating to fees)] requests a replacement or duplicate certificate.[(5) Provide boating safety education materials to persons who plan to take the boating safety course.(6) Replace a lost or destroyed certificate.(7) Establish reasonable charges for persons who take boating safety education courses conducted by the commission or commission volunteers. Such charges shall bear a reasonable relationship to the costs of providing the course and the course materials.]* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1418PN1640 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223